trunk/resultats/myspell/avl.myspell.dic
abjurava/AZ
ablaürat/BVY
abrilejava/AZ
abrivat/1BVY
acanalava/AZ
acaramel·lat/1BVY
accidentava/AZ
acoltellava/AZ
acomodat/1BVY
acotolava/AZ
acumulat/1BVY
adjuntiu/BVY
adjurava/AZ
aerificatiu/BVY
afaitava/AZ
afillolava/AZ
afissat/BVY
afusat/1BVY
agarbava/AZ
agossat/BVY
agostejava/AZ
aiguava/AZ
aixaropat/BVY
albergava/AZ
alcovat/BEVY
allancejava/AZ
alquilava/AZ
alteratiu/BVY
amassava/AZ
amelat/1BVY
amorgonava/AZ
anatematitzava/AZ
ancat/BVY
anquilosava/AZ
antiinductiu/BVY
apariava/AZ
aperceptiu/BVY
apinyotava/AZ
aplicat/1BVY
aposava/AZ
aproximatiu/BVY
aquartonava/AZ
argollat/1BVY
arpegiava/AZ
arrapadís/BVY
arregussava/AZ
arrogava/AZ
arronyonat/BVY
asilava/AZ
assalat/BVY
asseverava/AZ
associat/1BVY
ataronjat/BVY
atarquimava/AZ
atresorava/AZ
atrompetat/BVY
autocriticava/AZ
autodirigit/BVY
avesava/AZ
avinagrat/1BVY
balancejava/A
banyerut/B
baratava/A
batanejava/A
batau/B
benefactiu/B
bescavava/A
bicarbonatat/B
bilabiat/B
bisexuat/B
blasmava/A
bocut/B
bonificava/A
botonat/1B
botxinejava/A
brivava/A
brocatellat/B
bufetejava/A
cabrejava/A
calcigava/A
caliculat/B
canonava/A
caparrut/B
capiculava/A
carapigat/B
carbonatava/A
carròs/B
casava/A
cec/BE
cegallejava/A
ciliat/B
cinglava/A
clavetejava/A
cloendat/B
coejava/A
cogut/B
colonitzava/A
combatiu/B
compassava/A
complangut/B
concatenat/1B
concretava/A
condolit/23B
conglutinava/A
conjugat/1B
consolava/A
constrictiu/B
contraceptiu/B
contractava/A
convalidava/A
coordinat/1B
coregnava/A
corretjut/B
cotnava/A
creatiu/B
criticava/A
cuapunxegut/B
cursava/A
damnat/1B
declamava/A
decussat/B
deixondava/A
deliberatiu/B
dentava/A
depletiu/B
desaccelerava/A
desafectat/1B
desagregava/A
desaparroquiava/A
desaplicat/1B
desarrengava/A
desavingut/B
desbancava/A
desbrotava/A
descarat/1B
descarrerava/A
desconvengut/B
descossava/A
desembolcava/A
desempatava/A
desencasquetava/A
desendreçat/1B
desenforcava/A
desenrojolava/A
desesmussava/A
desfermat/1B
desglevava/A
desinteressat/1B
desionitzava/A
desmerletat/B
desnacionalitzava/A
desorbitat/1B
despenjava/A
desplagut/B
dessecallava/A
destarifat/B
desventrava/A
desvergonyit/23B
diaprat/B
dinava/A
discapacitat/BE
dissuasiu/B
dolorit/B
dormiscava/A
eductiu/BVY
elaborava/AZ
electiu/BVY
embarretat/BVY
embenava/AZ
embuinava/AZ
emmaregat/BVY
empal·liava/AZ
empillocava/AZ
empuat/BVY
enarçava/AZ
encarcanyava/AZ
encascavellat/BVY
encistellava/AZ
encongit/23BVY
encunyava/AZ
endillunsat/BVY
enfondrava/AZ
enforcallat/BVY
engegava/AZ
enllatava/AZ
ennierat/BVY
enrevenxinava/AZ
ensotava/AZ
entemat/BVY
entrecamava/AZ
entreviat/BVY
enverdescava/AZ
envitricollat/1BVY
erugat/BVY
esbafegava/AZ
esbrotava/AZ
escabellat/1BVY
escapat/1BVY
escaquejava/AZ
escolaritzava/AZ
escolorit/BVY
esfetgegava/AZ
esgallimpat/BVY
esllucava/AZ
espadat/1BVY
especialitzava/AZ
esperançat/1BVY
espitellava/AZ
esqueixalat/1BVY
esquiava/AZ
estenallat/1BVY
estiuejava/AZ
estufat/1BVY
esvolvava/AZ
exageratiu/BVY
expansiu/BVY
expirava/AZ
extractiu/BVY
fantasiava/A
fastigiat/B
ferrat/1BE
fimbriat/B
finançava/A
florit/23BE
fonamentava/A
fotoconductiu/B
fressejava/A
fugitiu/B
gambava/A
ganxut/B
genominvat/B
geomatitzava/A
gosat/1B
gratulava/A
gravitatiu/B
halogenat/BVY
hebraïtzava/AZ
iberut/BVY
imitava/AZ
immaculat/BVY
impennat/BVY
impunit/BVY
inaveat/BVY
inconfés/BVY
indisciplinat/1BVY
indisposava/AZ
inexecutat/BVY
infrarepresentat/BVY
inoperculat/BVY
instructiu/BVY
integrava/AZ
interordinat/BVY
inusitat/BVY
irreflexiu/BVY
italianitzava/AZ
labiat/B
lesiu/B
liquidava/A
llec/B
lliscava/A
lliurat/1B
maclat/B
malavingut/B
maleficiava/A
malgarbat/B
malsortat/B
manxec/B
marbrejava/A
membrat/1B
menava/A
metilat/1B
ministrava/A
moldau/B
mormolava/A
motiu/BE
musicat/1B
necrosava/A
normatiu/B
obsequiava/AZ
oclusiu/BVY
organofosforat/BVY
orquestrava/AZ
paput/B
paralogitzava/A
pellicava/A
penetratiu/B
pescava/A
peugròs/B
planava/A
poliesportiu/BE
popularitzava/A
predictiu/B
preocupava/A
privilegiatiu/B
propinava/A
punxut/B
quilificava/A
radiotelevisat/B
raspava/A
recamava/A
recessiu/B
redituava/A
refusava/A
regeneratiu/B
rellampeguejava/A
repanxolava/A
reprensiu/B
responsabilitzava/A
retrovenut/B
revaloritzava/A
romejava/A
runcinat/B
saldava/A
segregava/A
semidefinit/B
sinistrat/B
sistematitzava/A
solemnitzava/A
sostractiu/B
subexplotava/A
supletiu/B
taconejava/A
telegrafiava/A
terratremut/B
titllava/A
trafegut/B
tramava/A
tremolejava/A
triradiat/B
truncava/A
unitiu/BVY
vanava/A
verinut/B
vidriava/A
votiu/B
xapullava/A
